Missouri, session 2026, HB2878.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 171.031 as enacted by senate bill no. 727, one hundred second
general assembly, second regular session, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 171.031, to read as follows:
171.031. 1. (1) Each school board shall prepare annually a calendar for the school
term[,] specifying:
(a) The opening date[,];
(b) Days of planned attendance[,]; and [providing]
(c) The provision of a minimum term of at least one thousand forty-four hours of
actual pupil attendance[, and,].
(2) For a school district that is located wholly or partially in a county with a charter
form of government or a school district that is located wholly or partially in a city with more
than thirty thousand inhabitants, a minimum of one hundred [and] sixty-nine school days,
unless the district has adopted a four-day school week as provided in section 171.028, in
which case the district school term shall have a minimum of one hundred forty-two school
days. [In addition, such calendar shall include six make-up days for possible loss of
attendance due to inclement weather as defined in subsection 1 of section 171.033. In school
year 2019-20 and subsequent years,]
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2878 2
(3) Such calendar shall include thirty-six make-up hours for possible loss of
attendance due to inclement weather, as defined in subsection 1 of section 171.033[, with no
minimum number of make-up days].
2. Each local school district may set its opening date each year, which date shall be no
earlier than [fourteen] twenty-one calendar days prior to the first Monday in September. [No
public school district shall select an earlier start date unless, for calendars for school years
before school year 2020-21, the district follows the procedure set forth in subsection 3 of this
section. The procedure set forth in subsection 3 of this section shall be unavailable to school
districts in preparing their calendars for school year 2020-21 and for subsequent years.]
3. [For calendars for school years before school year 2020-21, a district may set an
opening date that is more than fourteen calendar days prior to the first Monday in September
only if the local school board first gives public notice of a public meeting to discuss the
proposal of opening school on a date more than fourteen days prior to the first Monday in
September, and the local school board holds said meeting and, at the same public meeting, a
majority of the board votes to allow an earlier opening date. If all of the previous conditions
are met, the district may set its opening date more than fourteen calendar days prior to the first
Monday in September. The condition provided in this subsection must be satisfied by the
local school board each year that the board proposes an opening date more than fourteen days
before the first Monday in September.
4.] If any local district violates the provisions of this section, the department of
elementary and secondary education shall withhold an amount equal to one quarter of the
state funding the district generated under section 163.031 for each date the district was in
violation of this section.
[5.] 4. The provisions of subsections 2 [to 4] and 3 of this section shall not apply to
school districts in which school is in session for twelve months of each calendar year.
[6.] 5. The state board of education may grant an exemption from this section to a
school district that demonstrates highly unusual and extenuating circumstances justifying
exemption from the provisions of subsections 2 [to 4] and 3 of this section. Any exemption
granted by the state board of education shall be valid for one academic year only.
✔